Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4331
Refunding bonds; procedures applicable.

The issue of refunding bonds, the manner of sale, maturities, interest rates, form, and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the risk management pool in respect of the same shall be governed by the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as the same may be applicable.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 31.